Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 311, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 60, O.S.L. 2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 311), is amended to read as follows:


Section 311. A. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law,


all regularly scheduled, continued or reconvened, special or


emergency meetings of public bodies shall be preceded by public


notice as follows:



Req. No. 2515 Page 1


1. All public bodies shall give notice in writing by December


of each calendar year of the schedule showing the date, time and


place of the regularly scheduled meetings of such public bodies for


the following calendar year;


2. All state public bodies including, but not limited to,


public trusts and other bodies with the state as beneficiary, shall


give such notice to the Secretary of State;


3. All county public bodies including, but not limited to,


public trusts and any other bodies with the county as beneficiary,


shall give such notice to the county clerk of the county wherein


they are principally located;


4. All municipal public bodies including, but not limited to,


public trusts and any other bodies with the municipality as


beneficiary, shall give such notice to the municipal clerk of the


municipality wherein they are principally located;


5. All multicounty, regional, areawide or district public


bodies including, but not limited to, district boards of education,


shall give such notice to the county clerk of the county wherein


they are principally located, or if no office exists, to the county


clerk of the county or counties served by such public body;


6. All governing boards of state institutions of higher


education, and committees and subcommittees thereof, shall give such


notice to the Secretary of State. All other public bodies covered


by the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act which exist under

Req. No. 2515 Page 2


the auspices of a state institution of higher education, but a


majority of whose members are not members of the institution’s


governing board, shall give such notice to the county clerk of the


county wherein the institution is principally located;


7. The Secretary of State and each county clerk or municipal


clerk shall keep a record of all notices received in a register open


to the public for inspection during regular office hours, and, in


addition, shall make known upon any request of any person the


contents of the register;


8. If any change is to be made of the date, time or place of


regularly scheduled meetings of public bodies, then notice in


writing shall be given to the Secretary of State or county clerk or


municipal clerk, as required herein, not less than ten (10) days


prior to the implementation of any such change;


9. a. In addition to the advance public notice in writing


required to be filed for regularly scheduled meetings,


described in paragraph 1 of this subsection, all


public bodies shall, at least twenty-four (24) hours


prior to such regularly scheduled meetings, display


public notice of the meeting by at least one of the


following methods:


(1) by posting information that includes date, time,


place and agenda for the meeting in prominent


public view at the principal office of the public

Req. No. 2515 Page 3


body or at the location of the meeting if no


office exists, or


(2) by posting on the public body’s Internet website


the date, time, place and agenda for the meeting


in accordance with Section 3106.2 311.1 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.


Additionally, the public body shall offer and


consistently maintain an email distribution


system for distribution of such notice of a


public meeting required by this subsection, and


any person may request to be included without


charge, and their his or her request shall be


accepted. The emailed notice of a public meeting


required by this subsection shall include in the


body of the email or as an attachment to the


email the date, time, place and agenda for the


meeting and it shall be sent no less than twenty-


four (24) hours prior to the meeting.


Additionally, the public body shall make the


notice of a public meeting required by this


subsection available to the public in the


principal office of the public body or at the


location of the meeting during normal business



Req. No. 2515 Page 4


hours at least twenty–four (24) hours prior to


the meeting.


b. In addition to the notice requirements of this


section, all state public bodies, as defined provided


in paragraph 2 of this subsection, shall, at least


twenty-four (24) hours prior to regularly scheduled


meetings, display public notice of the meeting by:


(1) posting information that includes date, time,


place and agenda for the meeting in prominent


public view at the principal office of the public


body or at the location of the meeting if no


office exists, and


(2) posting on the public body’s Internet website the


date, time, place and agenda for the meeting in


accordance with Section 3106.2 311.1 of Title 74


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


10. The twenty-four (24) hours required in paragraph 9 of this


subsection shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays and holidays legally


declared by the State of Oklahoma. The posting or distribution of a


notice of a public meeting as described in paragraph 9 of this


subsection shall not preclude a public body from considering at its


regularly scheduled meeting any new business. “New business”, as


used herein, shall mean any matter not known about or which could


not have been reasonably foreseen prior to the time of the posting;

Req. No. 2515 Page 5


11. In the event any meeting is to be continued or reconvened,


public notice of such action including date, time and place of the


continued meeting, shall be given by announcement at the original


meeting. Only matters appearing on the agenda of the meeting which


is continued may be discussed at the continued or reconvened


meeting;


12. Special meetings of public bodies shall not be held without


public notice being given at least forty-eight (48) hours prior to


the meetings. Such public notice of date, time and place shall be


given in writing, in person or by telephonic means to the Secretary


of State or to the county clerk or to the municipal clerk by public


bodies in the manner set forth in paragraphs 2, 3, 4, 5 and 6 of


this subsection. The public body also shall cause written notice of


the date, time and place of the meeting to be mailed or delivered to


each person, newspaper, wire service, radio station and television


station that has filed a written request for notice of meetings of


the public body with the clerk or secretary of the public body or


with some other person designated by the public body. Such written


notice shall be mailed or delivered at least forty-eight (48) hours


prior to the special meeting. The public body may charge a fee of


up to Eighteen Dollars ($18.00) per year to persons or entities


filing a written request for notice of meetings, and may require


such persons or entities to renew the request for notice annually.


In addition, all public bodies shall, at least twenty-four (24)

Req. No. 2515 Page 6


hours prior to such special meetings, display public notice of the


meeting, setting forth thereon the date, time, place and agenda for


the meeting. Only matters appearing on the posted agenda may be


considered at the special meeting. Such public notice shall be


posted in prominent public view at the principal office of the


public body or at the location of the meeting if no office exists.


Twenty-four The twenty-four (24) hours prior public posting required


by this paragraph shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays and holidays


legally declared by the State of Oklahoma. In lieu of the public


posting requirements of this paragraph, a public body may elect to


follow the requirements found in division (2) of subparagraph a of


paragraph 9 of this subsection, provided that forty-eight-hour


notice is required for special meetings and that the forty-eight-


hour requirement shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays and holidays


legally declared by the State of Oklahoma;


13. In the event of an emergency, an emergency meeting of a


public body may be held without the required public notice


heretofore required. Should an emergency meeting of a public body


be necessary, the person calling such a meeting shall give as much


advance public notice as is reasonable and possible under the


circumstances existing, in person or by telephonic or electronic


means; and


14. A public body that gives public notice of a meeting for


which there will be a videoconference option in accordance with

Req. No. 2515 Page 7


Section 307.1 of this title shall not modify the method of meeting


described in the notice prior to the meeting and shall conduct the


meeting according to the methods described in the notice. If a code


or password is required to access the videoconference meeting, the


code or password shall be included in the public notice.


B. 1. All agendas required pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall identify all items of business to be transacted by a


public body at a meeting including, but not limited to, any proposed


executive session for the purpose of engaging in deliberations or


rendering a final or intermediate decision in an individual


proceeding prescribed by the Administrative Procedures Act. No


action may be taken upon a matter raised during a period designated


for public comment until such matter has been specifically included


on an agenda as an item upon which action may be taken.


2. If a public body proposes to conduct an executive session,


the agenda shall:


a. contain sufficient information for the public to


ascertain that an executive session will be proposed,


b. identify the items of business and purposes of the


executive session, and


c. state specifically the provision of Section 307 of


this title authorizing the executive session.


3. a. Any interested member of the public may address a


public body on any agenda item, item of new business,

Req. No. 2515 Page 8


or any non-agenda item relevant to the function of the


public body in the time designated for public comment


at a meeting of the public body. Rules or policies of


a public body related to public comment shall be


limited to providing guidelines regarding the amount


of time a person may address the public body and


designating a specific portion of the meeting for


public comment. In no event may a public body


prohibit criticism of any act, omission, policy,


procedure, program, or service of the public body,


other than any criticism otherwise prohibited by law.


The requirements of this subparagraph shall not be


construed to prohibit a public body from maintaining


orderly conduct and proper decorum during a public


meeting.


b. The requirements of subparagraph a of this paragraph


shall not apply to:


(1) any official act that must be taken to address an


emergency situation affecting the public health,


welfare, or safety, if compliance with such


requirements would cause an unreasonable delay in


the ability of the public body to act, or


(2) any meeting not subject to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.

Req. No. 2515 Page 9


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2515 BLB 12/1/2025 10:23:22 AM











































Req. No. 2515 Page 10